data/grammar/fst/lexicon.lexc
LEXICON QParticles
QParticlesGenerated ;
QParticlesGeneratedSpeculative ;
# ;
! The hand entries that used to sit here (ttauq/qai/lu/li/1q, plain and
! with a stacking QParticles continuation, plus lu's VOICE "son"
! t/k/q-context form) were all byte-identical to QParticlesGenerated
! entries -- this lexicon already fans out to QParticlesGenerated above,
! so they were pure duplication. Their investigation notes moved to
! generate_affixes.py's PER-MORPHEME INVESTIGATION NOTES.

LEXICON Adverbs

! Adverb spelling variants that are NOT a _DIALECT_GROUPS cluster sub
! (those -- atsualuk/aksualuk, ippassaq/ippatsaq/ikpaksaq -- are now
! emitted by generate_roots.py's dialect_variants(); "qanu"/"qujannamii"
! surface from the LENIENT final-consonant rule).
! STILL A GAP: "uattiaru" of "uattiaruk"/1a (own trailing k dropped) --
! no hand entry, not generator-reachable.
!
! ("asuillaak" of "asuilaak"/1a (single l -> ll), "immagaa" (q -> g) and
!  "immaqa" (aa -> a) of "immaqaa"/1a, "surlu" of "suurlu"/1a (uu -> u)
!  used to be hand-wired here -- each is the ONLY gold word its entry
!  ever served (bare "asuillaak"/"immagaa"/"immaqa"/"surlu"), and each is
!  flagged isMisspelled() and excluded from the real :cli suite's own
!  evaluation. Removed, 0 regressions on the fair population.)

! ("maanna"/1a self-mapped to a "#" continuation used to be hand-wired
!  here -- AdverbsGenerated already reaches "maanna"; redundant, removed
!  2026-09-02 with 0 gold words lost.)

! Demonstrative spelling variants Demonstratives.csv doesn't record at
! all (that file has no "variant" column, unlike the root-source CSVs
! generate_roots.py reads) -- found the same way as "iglu"/"illu"
! above, by listing every gold word using these roots: "tagva"/ad-sc
! ("right here beside me", standalone) and "tagv"/rad-sc (its own
! root-taking-an-ending form, e.g. "tagv"+"ani"/tad-loc = "tagvani")
! are both attested with a "tavv"-spelled variant too ("tavva"
! standalone; "tavani"/"tavvani" alongside canonical "tagvani" for the
! SAME root+ending pair) -- free spelling variation, not a conditioned
! alternation (same trap "iglu"/"illu" above was originally
! mis-suspected of).
tagv+rad-sc:tav TadEndings ;

! "tam" spelling variant of "tama"/rad-ml, needed for "tamani" =
! tama+ani/tad-loc: plain concatenation "tama"+"ani" would give
! "tamaani" (double a), but gold's own attested surface drops one --
! found via a systematic sweep of every gold demonstrative word
! against every currently-wired root+ending spelling combination
! (rather than hunting sub-clusters one at a time), same evidence-based
! variant treatment as everywhere else in this file, just for a single
! word this time (not enough other evidence to tell whether this is a
! general vowel-hiatus rule or root-specific).
tama+rad-ml:tam TadEndings ;

LEXICON Pronouns

! Demonstrative-root spelling variants NOT reachable from a
! _DIALECT_GROUPS cluster sub: "tanna" of "taamna"/pd-sc-s (m -> nn),
! "taikua" of "taikkua"/pd-sc-p (kk -> k), "takkua" of "taakkua"/pd-sc-p
! (aa -> a). Each individual line looks redundant (its "#" and
! "QParticles" twin cover for each other), but removing a whole pair
! loses the bare standalone word -- so both twins stay. STILL A GAP:
! "taissu"/"taitsu" of "taiksu"/rpd-sc-s, "taqqakku" of "taqqapku"/
! rpd-mlsc-p.
taamna+pd-sc-s:tanna # ;
taamna+pd-sc-s:tanna QParticles ;
taikkua+pd-sc-p:taikua # ;
taikkua+pd-sc-p:taikua QParticles ;
taakkua+pd-sc-p:takkua # ;
taakkua+pd-sc-p:takkua QParticles ;

! "manna"/pd-ml-s (bulk-generated in demonstratives-generated.lexc,
! never hand-edited) only ever continued to "#"/QParticles -- gold
! attests it ALSO taking "u"/1nv ("mannaujuq" = manna+u+juq), the same
! "every X-producing morpheme should reach its full continuation set"
! gap already found and fixed for several other roots this session.
! Hand-added here as a parallel path rather than touching the
! generator (scoped to this one word, not re-checked against every
! other demonstrative root), confirmed via the real Java analyzer's
! own output before wiring.
manna+pd-ml-s:manna NvSuffixes ;
